apertium-sh-sl.sh.metadix
    <pardef n="te/žak__comp__sfx">
      <!-- Comparative --><!--Note: I've switched the definiteness marker here with <comp>, since definiteness is relevant only for positive, but I'm not sure if this is practical -->
      <!--Masculine-->
      <!--Singular-->
      <!--Animate-->
      <e><p><l>ži</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>žeg</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žega</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>žem</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žemu</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>žem</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žemu</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>žeg</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žega</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ži</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žim</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <!--Inanimate-->
      <e><p><l>ži</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>žeg</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žega</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>žem</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žemu</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>žem</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žemu</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ži</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ži</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žim</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <!--Plural-->
      <!--Animate-->
      <e><p><l>ži</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žih</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žim</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>žima</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žim</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>žima</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žim</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>žima</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>že</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ži</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

      <!--Inanimate-->
      <e><p><l>ži</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žih</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žim</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>žima</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žim</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>žima</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žim</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>žima</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>že</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ži</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

      <!--Feminine-->
      <!--Singular-->
      <e><p><l>ža</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>že</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žoj</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žoj</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žu</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ža</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žom</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <!--Plural-->
      <e><p><l>že</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žih</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žim</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>žima</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žim</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>žima</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žim</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>žima</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>že</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>že</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <!--Neuter-->
      <!--Singular-->
      <e><p><l>že</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>žeg</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žega</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žemu</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>žem</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žemu</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>žem</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>že</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>že</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>škim</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <!--Plural-->
      <e><p><l>ža</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žih</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žim</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>žima</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žim</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>žima</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žim</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>žima</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ža</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ža</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <!--Superlative--><!-- it's just "naj"+comparative-->
      <!--Absolute Superlative--><!-- "pre"+comparative, explained somewhere in this document-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="te/žak__ssup__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r>žak<s n="adj"/><s n="ssup"/></r></p><par n="te/žak__pst__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ško</l><r>ško<s n="adv"/><s n="ssup"/></r></p></e><!--removable-->
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="te/žak__sup__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r>žak<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r></p><par n="te/žak__comp__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>že</l><r>ško<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e><!--removable-->
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="te/žak__comp__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r>žak<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p><par n="te/žak__comp__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>že</l><r>ško<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e><!--removable-->
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="te/žak__pst__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r>žak<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/></r></p><par n="te/žak__pst__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ško</l><r>ško<s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--removable-->
    </pardef>

    <e lm="težak"><i>te</i><par n="te/žak__pst__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="težak"><i>te</i><par n="te/žak__comp__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="težak"><p><l>najte</l><r>te</r></p><par n="te/žak__sup__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="težak"><p><l>prete</l><r>te</r></p><par n="te/žak__ssup__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="težak"><i>te</i><par n="te/žak__pst__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="težak"><i>te</i><par n="te/žak__comp__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="težak"><p><l>najte</l><r>te</r></p><par n="te/žak__sup__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="težak"><p><l>prete</l><r>te</r></p><par n="te/žak__ssup__adj"/></e>
